Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-710.01
Judges; alternative contribution rate and retirement benefit; election; notice.

Any original member, as defined in section 24-701, who has not previously retired, may elect to make contributions and receive benefits pursuant to subsection (2) of section 24-703 and subsection (2) of section 24-710, instead of those provided by subsection (1) of section 24-703 and subsection (1) of section 24-710. Such election shall be by written notice delivered to the board not later than November 1, 1981. Such member shall thereafter be considered a future member.

Laws 1977, LB 344, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 459, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 92, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB790, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB415, § 20;

Laws 2023, LB103, § 6.